Washington statutes.
RCW 35.70.020

Owners' responsibility.

In all cities of the second class and towns the burden and expense of constructing sidewalks along the side of any street or other public place shall devolve upon and be borne by the property directly abutting thereon. The cost of reconstructing or repairing existing sidewalks may devolve upon the abutting property subject to the limitations in RCW 35.69.020 (2) and (3).

[ 1996 c 19 s 5; 1994 c 81 s 62; 1965 c 7 s 35.70.020. Prior: 1915 c 149 s 1; RRS s 9155.]